Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 2 Housing Cooperation Law

8-3-150.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Housing Cooperation Law.”

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “shall be known and may be cited as” for “may be referred to as” in this Code section.

Law reviews.

For survey of developments in Georgia real property law from mid-1980 through mid-1981, see 33 Mercer L. Rev. 219 (1981).

8-3-151.
Legislative findings and declaration of necessity.

It has been found and declared in Article 1 of this chapter, the “Housing Authorities Law,” that there exist in the state unsafe and insanitary housing conditions and a shortage of safe and sanitary dwelling accommodations for persons of low income; that these conditions necessitate excessive and disproportionate expenditures of public funds for crime prevention and punishment, public health and safety, fire and accident protection, and other public services and facilities; and that the public interest requires the remedying of these conditions. It is found and declared that the assistance provided in this article for the remedying of the conditions set forth in Article 1 of this chapter constitutes a public use and purpose and an essential governmental function for which public moneys may be spent, and that the provisions hereinafter enacted are necessary in the public interest.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 2.

8-3-152.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Federal government” means the United States of America or any agency or instrumentality, corporate or otherwise, of the United States of America.

“Housing authority” means any housing authority created pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter, the “Housing Authorities Law.”

“Housing project” means any work or undertaking of a housing authority pursuant to Article 1 of this chapter or any similar work or undertaking of the federal government.

“State public body” means any city, county, commission, district, authority, or other subdivision or public body of the state.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 3.

8-3-153.
Powers of state public bodies as to housing projects generally.

For the purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of housing projects located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

Dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its property to a housing authority or the federal government;

Cause parks, playgrounds, recreational or community facilities, or any other works which it is otherwise empowered to undertake, to be furnished adjacent to or in connection with housing projects;

Furnish, dedicate, close, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan, or replan streets, roads, roadways, alleys, sidewalks, or other places which it is otherwise empowered to undertake;

Plan or replan, zone or rezone any part of such state public body; make exceptions from building regulations and ordinances; and, in the case of a city, change its map;

Cause services to be furnished to a housing authority of the character which such state public body is otherwise empowered to furnish;

Enter into agreements with respect to the exercise by such state public body of its powers relating to the repair, closing, or demolition of unsafe, insanitary, or unfit dwellings;

Notwithstanding any other law, employ any funds belonging to or within the control of such state public body, including funds derived from the sale or furnishing of property or facilities to a housing authority, in the purchase of the bonds or other obligations of a housing authority; and exercise all the rights of any holder of such bonds or other obligations;

Enter into agreements (which may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provision or rule of law to the contrary) with a housing authority or the federal government respecting action to be taken by such state public body pursuant to any of the powers granted by this article. If at any time title to, or possession of, any project is held by any public body or governmental agency authorized by law to engage in the development or administration of low-rent housing, slum clearance, or urban redevelopment projects, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, such agreements shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency; and

Do any and all things, necessary or convenient to aid and cooperate in the planning, undertaking, construction, or operation of such housing projects.

With respect to any housing project which a housing authority has acquired or taken over from the federal government and which the housing authority by resolution has found and declared to have been constructed in a manner that will promote the public interest and afford necessary safety, sanitation, and other protection, no state public body shall require any changes to be made in the housing project or the manner of its construction or take any other action relating to such construction.

In connection with any public improvements made by a state public body in exercising the powers granted by this article, such state public body may incur the entire expense thereof. Any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this Code section may be made by a state public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 4; Ga. L. 1939, p. 127, § 1; Ga. L. 1951, p. 204, § 1.

8-3-154.
Contracts for payments to state public bodies for improvements, services, and facilities provided.

In connection with any housing project located wholly or partly within the area in which it is authorized to act, any state public body may contract with a housing authority or the federal government with respect to the sum or sums, if any, which the housing authority or the federal government may agree to pay, during any year or period of years, to the state public body for the improvements, services, and facilities to be provided by the state public body for the benefit of said housing project or its residents; but in no event shall the amount of such payments exceed the estimated cost to the state public body of the improvements, services, or facilities to be so supplied; provided, however, that the absence of a contract for such payments shall in no way relieve state public bodies of the duty to furnish, for the benefit of said housing project and its residents, customary improvements and such services and facilities as state public bodies usually furnish without a service fee.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 5.

8-3-155.
Appropriations to an authority by a city or a county for first-year expenses; loans and donations to authority.

When any housing authority which is created for any city or county becomes authorized to transact business and exercises its powers therein, the city council or the county commissioners, as the case may be, shall immediately make an estimate of the amount of money necessary for the administrative expense and overhead of such housing authority during the first year thereafter and shall appropriate such amount to the authority out of any moneys in such city or county treasury not appropriated to some other purposes. The moneys so appropriated shall be paid to the authority as a donation.

Any city or county located in whole or in part within the area of operation of a housing authority shall have the power from time to time to lend or donate money to the authority or to agree to take such action. The housing authority, when it has money available therefor, shall make reimbursement for all such loans made to it.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 6.

8-3-156.
Procedure for exercise of powers granted by article to state public bodies.

The exercise by a state public body of the powers granted by this article may be authorized by resolution of the governing body of such state public body. The resolution shall be adopted by a majority of the members of the governing body present at a meeting of said governing body, which resolution may be adopted at the meeting at which such resolution is introduced. Such a resolution or resolutions shall take effect immediately and need not be laid over or published or posted.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 697, § 7; Ga. L. 1939, p. 127, § 2; Ga. L. 1941, p. 253, § 1; Ga. L. 1943, p. 142, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1943, p. 166, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1949, p. 23, §§ 1-4; Ga. L. 1959, p. 141, § 4; Ga. L. 1961, p. 54, §§ 2-4.